Mississippi, session 2026, HB1731.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Department of Finance and Administration, acting on behalf of the Department of Revenue, is authorized to transfer and convey to an entity with whom the Department of Finance and Admonition and Department of Revenue have entered into negotiations for the purchase thereof, real property located at 1286 Gluckstadt Road in the City of Gluckstadt, Mississippi, and any improvements thereon including the building and relating facilities being used, as of the effective date of this act, by the Department of Revenue for the Alcoholic Beverage Control Warehouse. (2)  ﻿﻿﻿﻿The State of Mississippi shall retain all mineral rights to the real property transferred under this section. ﻿﻿﻿(3)  The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to correct any discrepancies in the legal description of the property provided in this section.﻿﻿﻿ (4)  Any monies derived from the sale of the property described in subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited into a special fund and used by the Department of Revenue to offset the cost of constructing the relocated new ABC Warehouse located in Canton, Madison County, Mississippi. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.